District of Columbia statutes.
31-6209

Repealed

Violations

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 13(b), 40 DCR 6009
D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(s) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends these sections subsequent to repeal.
1981 Ed., §§ 35-1601 to 35-1609.